Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-914
Sewers; resolution to construct; publication; hearing.

Notice of the time when any resolution under section 17-913 shall be set for consideration before the city council or village board of trustees shall be given by at least two publications in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in the city or village, which publication shall contain the entire wording of the resolution. The last publication shall be not less than five days nor more than two weeks prior to the time set for hearing of objections to the passage of any such resolution, at which hearing the owners of the property which might become subject to assessment for the contemplated improvement may appear and make objections to the proposed improvement. Following the publication, the resolution may be amended and passed or passed as proposed.

Laws 1919, c. 189, § 1, p. 428;

C.S.1922, § 4338;

C.S.1929, § 17-529;

R.S.1943, § 17-914;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 250.

Compliance was had with the requirements of this section. Jones v. Village of Farnam, 174 Neb. 704, 119 N.W.2d 157 (1963).

Resolution of necessity may be amended. Hutton v. Village of Cairo, 159 Neb. 342, 66 N.W.2d 820 (1954).